Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 6. State Mental Health Policy.

Administrative Code. —

For civil commitment, see 7 AAC 72.

Sec. 47.30.655.
Purpose and principles of major revision.

The purpose of the 1981 major revision of Alaska civil commitment statutes (AS

47.30.660

and

47.30.670

—

47.30.915

) is to more adequately protect the legal rights of persons suffering from mental illness.
The legislature has attempted to balance the individual’s constitutional right to physical liberty and the state’s interest in protecting society from persons who are dangerous to others and protecting persons who are dangerous to themselves by providing due process safeguards at all stages of commitment proceedings.
In addition, the following principles of modern mental health care have guided this revision:

that persons be given every reasonable opportunity to accept voluntary treatment before involvement with the judicial system;

that persons be treated in the least restrictive alternative environment consistent with their treatment needs;

that treatment occur as promptly as possible and as close to the individual’s home as possible;

that a system of mental health community facilities and supports be available;

that patients be informed of their rights and be informed of and allowed to participate in their treatment program as much as possible;

that persons who are mentally ill but not dangerous to others be committed only if there is a reasonable expectation of improving their mental condition.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

The parenthetical reference in the first sentence was added in 1981 under AS

01.05.031

, and revised in 1987 to reflect the enactment of AS

47.30.661

—

47.30.666

.

Sec. 47.30.660.
Powers and duties of department.

The department shall

prepare, and periodically revise and amend, a plan for an integrated comprehensive mental health program, as that term is defined by AS

47.30.056(i)

; the preparation of the plan and any revision or amendment of it shall

be made in conjunction with the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority;

be coordinated with federal, state, regional, local, and private entities involved in mental health services;

in planning expenditures from the mental health trust settlement income account, conform to the regulations adopted by the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority under AS

47.30.031(b)(5)

; and

implement an integrated comprehensive system of care that, within the limits of money appropriated for that purpose and using grants and contracts that are to be paid for from the mental health trust settlement income account, meets the service needs of the beneficiaries of the trust established under the Alaska Mental Health Enabling Act of 1956, as determined by the plan.

The department, in fulfilling its duties under this section and through its division responsible for mental health, shall

administer a comprehensive program of services for persons with mental disorders, for the prevention of mental illness, and for the care and treatment of persons with mental disorders, including inpatient and outpatient care and treatment and the procurement of services of specialists or other persons on a contractual or other basis;

take the actions and undertake the obligations that are necessary to participate in federal grants-in-aid programs and accept federal or other financial aid from whatever sources for the study, prevention, examination, care, and treatment of persons with mental disorders;

administer AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

;

designate, operate, and maintain treatment facilities equipped and qualified to provide inpatient and outpatient care and treatment for persons with mental disorders;

provide for the placement of patients with mental disorders in designated treatment facilities;

enter into arrangements with governmental agencies for the care or treatment of persons with mental disorders in facilities of the governmental agencies in the state or in another state;

enter into contracts with treatment facilities for the custody and care or treatment of persons with mental disorders; contracts under this paragraph are governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code);

enter into contracts, which incorporate safeguards consistent with AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

and the preservation of the civil rights of the patients with another state for the custody and care or treatment of patients previously committed from this state under 48 U.S.C. 46 et seq., and P.L. 84-830, 70 Stat. 709;

prescribe the form of applications, records, reports, requests for release, and consents to medical or psychological treatment required by AS 47.30.660 — 47.30.915;

require reports from the head of a treatment facility concerning the care of patients;

visit each treatment facility at least annually to review methods of care or treatment for patients;

investigate complaints made by a patient or an interested party on behalf of a patient;

delegate upon mutual agreement to another officer or agency of it, or a political subdivision of the state, or a treatment facility designated, any of the duties and powers imposed upon it by AS 47.30.660 — 47.30.915;

after consultation with the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority, adopt regulations to implement the provisions of AS 47.30.660 — 47.30.915;

provide technical assistance and training to providers of mental health services; and

set standards under which each designated treatment facility shall provide programs to meet patients’ medical, psychological, social, vocational, educational, and recreational needs.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 59 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 36 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 109 SLA 1992; am § 33 ch 5 FSSLA 1994; am § 74 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, in paragraphs (a)(2) and (a)(3) of this section, “mental health trust settlement income account” was substituted for “mental health trust income account” pursuant to sec. 17, ch. 1, SSSLA 1994. In 2008, in (a)(2) of this section, “AS

47.30.031(b)(5)

” was substituted for “AS

47.30.031(b)(6)

” to reflect the 2008 renumbering of AS

47.30.031(b)(6)

.

Administrative Code. —

For standards for operation of a community mental health center, see 7 AAC 71, art. 3.

For scope and applicability, see 7 AAC 72, art. 1.

For designation of facilities, see 7 AAC 72, art. 2.

For requirements for designated facilities, see 7 AAC 72, art. 3.

For procedures for emergency examinations, see 7 AAC 72, art. 4.

For procedures for evaluations, see 7 AAC 72, art. 5.

For procedures for designation of evaluation personnel, see 7 AAC 72, art. 6.

For procedures for evaluations conducted by evaluation personnel, see 7 AAC 72, art. 7.

For appeals, see 7 AAC 72, art. 9.

For mental health treatment assistance program, see 7 AAC 72, art. 10.

For submission of information, see 7 AAC 85, art. 1.

For use, disclosure, and access, see 7 AAC 85, art. 2.

For electronic medical records, see 7 AAC 85, art. 3.

For security, see 7 AAC 85, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, rewrote the lead-in language of (b), which read, “The department, in fulfilling its duties under this section and through its division of mental health and developmental disabilities, shall”.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The commissioner of Health and Social Services is clearly vested with the discretion to designate a properly licensed private facility for placement of persons civilly committed by the courts to the commissioner’s custody, and such discretion exists whether such commitments be pursuant to AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

, AS

12.47.090

, or AS

12.47.110

; however, a statutory revision to more clearly define such powers and duties regarding criminal commitments would be beneficial. July 8, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

40A Am. Jur. 2d, Hospitals and Asylums, § 1 et seq.

53 Am. Jur. 2d, Mentally Impaired Persons, § 1 et seq.

56 C.J.S., Mental Health, § 1 et seq.